California statutes. Corporations Code
Shares in a professional corporation or a foreign professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state may be transferred only to a licensed person, to a shareholder of the same corporation, to a person licensed to practice the same profession in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the person practices, or to a professional corporation, and any transfer in violation of this restriction shall be void, except as provided herein.

A professional corporation may purchase its own shares without regard to any restrictions provided by law upon the repurchase of shares, if at least one share remains issued and outstanding.

If a professional corporation or a foreign professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state shall fail to acquire all of the shares of a shareholder who is disqualified from rendering professional services in this state or of a deceased shareholder who was, on his or her date of death, licensed to render professional services in this state, or if such a disqualified shareholder or the representative of such a deceased shareholder shall fail to transfer said shares to the corporation, to another shareholder of the corporation, to a person licensed to practice the same profession in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the person practices, or to a licensed person, within 90 days following the date of disqualification, or within six months following the date of death of the shareholder, as the case may be, then the certificate of registration of the corporation may be suspended or revoked by the governmental agency regulating the profession in which the corporation is engaged. In the event of such a suspension or revocation, the corporation shall cease to render professional services in this state.

Notwithstanding any provision in this part, upon the death or incapacity of a dentist, any individual named in subdivision (a) of Section 1625.3 of the Business and Professions Code may employ licensed dentists and dental assistants and charge for their professional services for a period not to exceed 12 months from the date of death or incapacity of the dentist. The employment of licensed dentists and dental assistants shall not be deemed the practice of dentistry within the meaning of Section 1625 of the Business and Professions Code, provided that all of the requirements of Section 1625.4 of the Business and Professions Code are met. If an individual listed in Section 1625.3 of the Business and Professions Code is employing licensed persons and dental assistants, then the shares of a deceased or incapacitated dentist shall be transferred as provided in this section no later than 12 months from the date of death or incapacity of the dentist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 433, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

13408.

The following shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the certificate of registration of a professional corporation or a foreign professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state: (a) if all shareholders who are licensed persons of such corporation shall at any one time become disqualified persons, or (b) if the sole shareholder shall become a disqualified person, or (c) if such corporation shall knowingly employ or retain in its employment a disqualified person, or (d) if such corporation shall violate any applicable rule or regulation adopted by the governmental agency regulating the profession in which such corporation is engaged, or (e) if such corporation shall violate any statute applicable to a professional corporation or to a foreign professional corporation, or (f) any ground for such suspension or revocation specified in the Business and Professions Code relating to the profession in which such corporation is engaged. In the event of such suspension or revocation of its certificate of registration such corporation shall cease forthwith to render professional services in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 910, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13408.5.

A professional corporation shall not be formed so as to cause any violation of law, or any applicable rules and regulations, relating to fee splitting, kickbacks, or other similar practices by physicians and surgeons or psychologists, including, but not limited to, Section 650 or subdivision (e) of Section 2960 of the Business and Professions Code. A violation of any such provisions shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the certificate of registration of the professional corporation. The Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation or the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care may refer any suspected violation of those provisions to the governmental agency regulating the profession in which the corporation is, or proposes to be engaged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 63.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13409.

(a) Subject to Section 201, a professional corporation may adopt any name permitted by a law expressly applicable to the profession in which the corporation is engaged or by a rule or regulation of the governmental agency regulating that profession. The Secretary of State may require proof by affidavit or otherwise establishing that the name of the professional corporation complies with the requirements of this section and of the law governing the profession in which that professional corporation is engaged. The statements of fact in those affidavits may be accepted by the Secretary of State as sufficient proof of the facts.

(b) Subject to Section
 201, a foreign professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state may transact intrastate business in this state by any name permitted by a law expressly applicable to the profession in which the corporation is engaged, or by a rule or regulation of the governmental agency regulating the rendering of professional services in this state by the corporation. The Secretary of State may require proof by affidavit or otherwise establishing that the name of the foreign professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state complies with the requirements of this section and of the law governing the profession in which the foreign professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state proposes to engage in this state. The statements of fact in those affidavits may be accepted by the Secretary of State as sufficient proof of
 the facts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 361, Sec. 12.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13410.

(a) A professional corporation or a foreign professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state shall be subject to the applicable rules and regulations adopted by, and all the disciplinary provisions of the Business and Professions Code expressly governing the practice of the profession in this state, and to the powers of, the governmental agency regulating the profession in which such corporation is engaged. Nothing in this part shall affect or impair the disciplinary powers of any such governmental agency over licensed persons or any law, rule or regulation pertaining to the standards for professional conduct of licensed persons or to the professional relationship between any licensed person furnishing professional services and the person receiving such services.

(b) With respect to any foreign professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state, each such governmental agency shall adopt rules, regulations, and orders as appropriate to restrict or prohibit any disqualified person from doing any of the following:

(1) Being a shareholder, director, officer, or employee of the corporation.

(2) Rendering services in any profession in which he or she is a disqualified person.

(3) Participating in the management of the corporation.

(4) Sharing in the income of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 910, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 5. SMALL BUSINESSES [14000. - 14024.]



  CHAPTER 1. California Small Business Financial Development Corporations  [14000. - 14024.]



  ARTICLE 1. Introduction [14000. - 14002.]

14000.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Small Business Financial Development Corporation Law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to promote the economic development of small businesses through the California Small Business Finance Center by making available capital, general management assistance, and other resources, including financial services, personnel, and business education to small business entrepreneurs, including women, veteran, and minority-owned businesses, for the purpose of promoting the health, safety, and social welfare of the citizens of California, to eliminate unemployment of the economically disadvantaged of the state, and to stimulate economic development and entrepreneurship.

(b) It is the further intent of the Legislature to provide a flexible means to mobilize and
 commit all available and potential resources in the various regions of the state to fulfill these objectives, including federal, state, and local public resources, and private debt and equity investment.

(c) It is the further intent of the Legislature that corporations operating pursuant to this law shall, to the maximum extent feasible, coordinate with other job and business development efforts within their region directed toward implementing the purpose of this chapter.

(d) It is the further intent of the Legislature to provide expanded resources allowing participation by small and emerging contractors in state public works contracts. Increased access to surety bonding resources will assist in supporting participation by those firms in public works contracts, and by stimulating increased participation by small firms, the state will benefit from increased competition and lower
 bid costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 23.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, this invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [14003. - 14003.]

14003.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Bank” means the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank.

(b) “Bank board” means the board of directors of the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank.

(c) “Board of directors” means the board of directors of the corporation.

(d) “California Small
 Business Board” means the advisory board established pursuant to Section 14004.1 for the purpose of advising on issues and programs affecting small business.

(e) “California Small Business Finance Center” means the governmental unit within the bank, which is located within the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, with the administrative responsibility for the programs and activities authorized pursuant to Section 8684.2 of the Government Code, the Small Business Financial Assistance Act of 2013 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 63088) of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code), and this chapter.

(f) “Corporation” means any nonprofit California small business financial development corporation created pursuant to this chapter, or pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 32000) of Division 15.5 of the Financial Code.

(g) “Directives and requirements” means a document adopted by the bank board setting forth policy direction as well as key rules governing a particular subject area.

(h) “Executive director” means the executive director of the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank.

(i) “Expansion fund” means the California Small Business Expansion Fund authorized pursuant to Section 63089.5 of the Government Code.

(j) “Financial company” means banking organizations, including national banks and trust companies, savings and loan associations, certified community development financial institutions, microbusiness lenders, state insurance companies, mutual insurance companies, and other public
 and private banking, lending, retirement, and insurance organizations.

(k) “Financial institution” means regulated banking organizations, including national banks and trust companies authorized to conduct business in the state and state-chartered commercial banks, trust companies, credit unions, and savings and loan associations.

(l) “Financial product” means the type of financial assistance described in Section 63088.5 of the Government Code or that the California Small Business Finance Center or a small business financial development corporation is otherwise authorized to provide.

(m) “Loan committee” means a committee appointed by the board of directors of a corporation to determine the course of action on a loan application pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 63088) of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the
 Government Code.

(n) “Microbusiness lender” means a microbusiness lender as defined in Section 13997.2 of the Government Code.

(o) “Program manager” means the manager of the California Small Business Finance Center as designated to this title by the executive director of the bank.

(p) “Trust fund” means the money from the expansion fund that is held in trust by a financial institution or financial company. A trust fund is not a deposit of state funds and is not subject to the requirements of Section 16506 of the Government Code.

(q) “Trust fund account” means an account within the trust fund that is either allocated to a
 particular corporation or shared by multiple corporations for the purpose of paying loan defaults and claims on bond guarantees or other financial products and program uses provided in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Program Manager [14004. - 14004.2.]

14004.

(a) The program manager shall do all of the following:

(1) Administer this chapter.

(2) Make recommendations to the executive director and the bank board on the approval or disapproval of the articles of incorporation. This determination shall be based upon the following:

(A) Review of the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the corporation to determine whether they contain the provisions required by this chapter and conform with the directives and requirements adopted by the bank board pursuant to this chapter.

(B) A determination as to whether the legislative intent
 expressed in Section 14001 shall be served by the proposed corporation.

(C) A determination as to whether the responsibility, character, and general fitness of the individuals who will manage the corporation are such as to command the confidence of the state and to warrant the belief that the business of the proposed corporation will be honestly and efficiently conducted in accordance with the intent and purpose of this chapter and that they include representatives of the financial and business community, as well as the economically disadvantaged.

(D) A determination by the program manager that there is significant need for a new corporation.

(3) Have the accounts of each corporation formed under this chapter examined and audited as of the close of business on June 30 of each year. Material examination exceptions
 that are not corrected by the corporation within a reasonable period of time may result in the suspension or termination of the corporation pursuant to Section 63089.3 of the Government Code.

(4) Have the portfolio of each corporation examined a minimum of once a year. Material examination exceptions that are not corrected by the corporation within a reasonable period of time may result in the suspension or termination of the corporation pursuant to Section 63089.3 of the Government Code.

(5) Review reports from the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation and inform corporations as to what corrective action is required.

(6) Examine, or cause to be examined, at any reasonable time, all books, records, and documents of every kind, and the physical properties of a corporation. The inspection shall include the
 right to make copies, extracts, and search records.

(b) The program manager may attend and participate at corporation meetings. The program manager, or their designee, shall be an ex officio, nonvoting representative on the board of directors and loan committees of each corporation. The program manager shall meet through telecommunication or in person with the board of directors of each corporation at least once each fiscal year, commencing January 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 64.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.1.

(a) The California Small Business Board is hereby continued and created as an advisory board to the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank Board, the executive director, and the program manager. The California Small Business Board may also advise the Governor and the Small Business Advocate regarding issues and programs affecting California’s small business community, including, but not limited to, business innovation and expansion, export finance, state procurement, management and technical assistance, venture capital, and financial assistance.

(b) The California Small Business Board consists of the following membership:

(1) The Director of Finance or his or her designee.

(2) The Director of the Office of the Small Business Advocate or his or her designee.

(3) The Treasurer or his or her designee.

(4) A representative from two different corporations selected by the corporations.

(5) Four members appointed by the Governor, one of whom will serve as chair of the California Small Business Board, who are actively involved in the California small business community.

(6) Two persons actively involved in the business or agricultural communities, one appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and one appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(7) Two Members of the Legislature, or their designees, one appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and one appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, so long as it does not conflict with their duties as legislators.

(c) The California Small Business Board shall advise the program manager on matters regarding this chapter and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 63088) of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code.

(d) The public members of the California Small Business Board, at the discretion of the bank board, may be reimbursed per diem and travel expenses pursuant to state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.2.

The bank board shall approve new corporations recommended by the program manager, based on an examination of each of the following:

(a) Review of the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the corporation to determine whether they contain the provisions required by this chapter and conform with the directives and requirements adopted by the bank board pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Determination as to whether the legislative intent expressed in Section 14001 will be served by the proposed corporation.

(c) Determination as to whether the responsibility, character, and general fitness of the
 individuals who will manage the corporation are able to command the confidence of the state and to warrant the belief that the business of the proposed corporation will be honestly and efficiently conducted in accordance with the intent and purpose of this chapter and that they include representatives of the financial and business community, as well as the economically disadvantaged.

(d) Determination of the program manager that there is significant need for a new corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. New Corporations [14005. - 14012.]

14005.

Upon approval by the bank board to become a corporation, an entity shall adopt or amend its articles of incorporation to comply with the following:

(a) The name of the corporation shall include the words “small business financial development corporation,” except for those corporations formed pursuant to this chapter prior to 2002, which may also be called “small business development corporations,” or those formed prior to 1985, which may also be called “rural or urban development corporations.”

(b) The purposes for which the
 corporation is formed, which shall be those specified in Section 14001. This requirement shall not be deemed to preclude a statement of powers.

(c) A geographical description of the corporation’s primary service area.

(d) The name and addresses of seven or more persons who are to act in the capacity of directors until the selection of their successors.

(e) That the corporation is organized pursuant to the California Small Business Financial Development Corporation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.

If the bank board concurs with the findings of the program manager pursuant to Section 14004, the bank board shall direct the program manager to approve the articles of incorporation and endorse the approval thereon and forward the same to the Secretary of State for his or her approval and filing. Likewise, the program manager shall review all amendments to the articles of incorporation to ensure consistency with the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.

(a) The corporation’s existence as a small business financial development corporation begins upon the filing of the articles with the Secretary of State and continues perpetually, unless otherwise expressly provided for by law. 

(b) If a corporation is terminated from participation in all programs, in order to continue its existence as a nonprofit corporation pursuant to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), the corporation shall amend its articles of incorporation in accordance with Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5180) of Part 2 of
 Division 2 of Title 1 to remove the provisions required by Section 14005, including an amendment to remove the words “small business financial development corporation,” “small business development corporation,” or “rural or urban development corporation,” as applicable, from the corporate name, and shall no longer be registered with the Secretary of State as a small business financial development corporation. A corporation shall not enjoy any of the benefits of a small business financial development corporation following termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14009.

(a) Each corporation shall have provisions establishing a grievance procedure for employees, clients, or potential clients, to appeal a decision or obtain redress of an action done by the staff or loan committee of the corporation. The procedures shall be established in writing during the probationary period of a new corporation. 

(b) The bylaws of the corporation shall authorize the removal of officers only by a two-thirds vote of the directors of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.

The Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of this title) applies to corporations formed under this chapter, except as to matters otherwise provided for in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14012.

For six months following the establishment of a corporation, commencing upon filing of the articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State, a corporation shall be on probation. While on probation, a corporation may be suspended if suspension is recommended by the program manager and affirmed by the executive director. This suspension is nonappealable and not subject to the procedures for suspension applicable to a corporation not on probation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Corporation Board [14013. - 14017.]

14013.

The corporate powers of a corporation shall be exercised by its board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14014.

The bank shall enter into a contract with each corporation that shall require that:

(a) A person may not serve on a corporation’s board of directors who is not a resident of, or person conducting business in, the primary service area described in the articles of incorporation.

(b) A corporation’s board of directors shall include representatives from all of the following:

(1) The financial
 community.

(2) The business community.

(3) The economically disadvantaged.

(c) The chief executive officer of a corporation, or his or her designee, is the only employee of the corporation who may serve on its board of directors.

(d) A person who has a financial interest related to a matter over which the board of directors has authority may not make, participate in making, or in any way attempt to influence that matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14015.

If any director ceases to meet the qualifications established in Section 14014, he or she shall immediately vacate his or her position as a director and the position shall be deemed vacant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.

If any vacancy occurs in the elective membership of the board of directors through death, resignation, or otherwise, the remaining directors shall elect a person representing the appropriate category to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14017.

The bank board shall direct the program manager to establish new small business financial development corporations pursuant to the directives and requirements. The directives and requirements shall include steps to achieve a goal of ensuring that small businesses in all areas of the state would have reasonable access to the financial products authorized by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 63088) of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code for which they are eligible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Corporations, Miscellaneous [14018. - 14021.]

14018.

Every corporation shall provide for, and maintain a central staff to perform, all administrative requirements of the corporation, including all those functions required of a corporation by the contract and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14019.

Reasonable costs incurred by a corporation in the creation and maintenance of a central staff shall be paid to the corporation from state funds, including a portion of the interest earned on the expansion fund and the corporation’s trust fund account, if the corporation has a trust fund account, otherwise, on the expansion fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14020.

A corporation shall report to the program manager, or his or her designated representative, all statistical and other reports required by this chapter and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 63088) of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code, including responses to audit reports, budget requirements, and other information relating to the establishment, monitoring, and suspension or termination of a corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.

A corporation shall make a report to the program manager, as required by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 63088) of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Conflict of Interest [14022. - 14024.]

14022.

It shall be unlawful for a member of the bank board or for the executive director, program manager, or any person who is an officer, director, contractor, or employee of a corporation, or who is a member of a loan committee, or who is an employee of the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank to do any of the following:

(a) Ask for, consent, or agree to receive, any commission, emolument, gratuity, money, property, or thing of value for his or her own use, benefit, or personal advantage, for procuring or endeavoring to procure for any person, partnership, joint venture, association, or corporation, any loan, guarantee, financial, or other
 assistance from any corporation.

(b) Borrow money, property, or to benefit knowingly, directly or indirectly, from the use of the money, credit, or property of any corporation.

(c) Make, maintain, or attempt to make or maintain, a deposit of the funds of a corporation with any other corporation or association on condition, or with the understanding, expressed or implied, that the corporation or association receiving the deposit shall pay any money or make a loan or advance, directly or indirectly, to any person, partnership, joint venture, association, or corporation, other than to a corporation formed under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14023.

It shall be unlawful for a member of the bank board or for the executive director, program manager, or any person who is an officer or director of a corporation, or who is an employee of the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank to purchase or receive, or to be otherwise interested in the purchase or receipt, directly or indirectly, of any asset of a corporation, without paying to the corporation the fair market value of the asset at the time of the transaction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14024.

Violation of any provision of this article shall constitute a felony.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1247)   Effective October 4, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 6. EMPLOYEE-OWNED BUSINESSES [14200. - 14200.]

14200.

The Legislature finds and declares that the formation of employee-owned businesses and the participation of employees in the management of businesses in this state will promote the stabilization of local economies, anchor business activity, and increase productivity. The Legislature further finds that the encouragement of employee-owned businesses will increase and broaden community investments in this state and encourage new capital formation through employee ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 429, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 7. GENERAL PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO CERTAIN CORPORATIONS [14300. - 14318.]



  CHAPTER 1. Water Companies [14300. - 14307.]

14300.

(a) Any corporation organized for or engaged in the business of selling, distributing, supplying, or delivering water for irrigation purposes may provide, and any corporation organized for or engaged in the business of selling, distributing, supplying, or delivering water for domestic use shall provide, in its articles or bylaws that water shall be sold, distributed, supplied, or delivered only to owners of its shares and that the shares shall be appurtenant to certain lands when the same are described in the certificate issued therefor; and when the certificate is so issued and a certified copy of the articles or bylaws recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county where the lands are situated the shares of stock shall become
 appurtenant to the lands and shall only be transferred therewith, except after sale or forfeiture for delinquent assessments thereon as provided in Section 14303. Notwithstanding this provision in its articles or bylaws, any such corporation may sell water to the state, or any department or agency thereof, or to any school district, or to any public agency, or, to any other mutual water company or, during any emergency resulting from fire or other disaster involving danger to public health or safety, to any person at the same rates as to holders of shares of the corporations; and provided further, that any corporation may enter into a contract with a county fire protection district to furnish water to fire hydrants and for fire suppression or fire prevention purposes at a flat rate per hydrant or other connection. In the event lands to which any stock is appurtenant are owned or purchased by the state, or any department or agency thereof, or any school district, or public agency, the stock shall be canceled
 by the secretary, but shall be reissued to any person later acquiring title to the land from the state department, agency, or school district, or public agency.

(b) A corporation described in subdivision (a) shall be known as a mutual water company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 512, Sec. 2.   (AB 54)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14300.5.

For purposes of this chapter, “public water system” shall have the same meaning as provided in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 512, Sec. 3.   (AB 54)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.

A corporation, including a nonprofit corporation organized for or engaged in the business of developing, distributing, supplying, or delivering water for irrigation or domestic use, or both, may provide in its articles, or may amend its articles to provide, that its only purpose shall be to develop, distribute, supply, or deliver water for irrigation or domestic use, or both, to its members or shareholders, at actual cost plus necessary expenses.

The amendment of the articles may be accomplished by:

(a) The passage by a three-fourths vote of the members of the board of directors of the corporation of a resolution adopting as the purpose of the corporation the purpose set forth in this section.

(b) The signing, verification, and filing of a certificate setting forth the resolution and the manner of its adoption.

The corporation shall not distribute any gains, profits, or dividends to its members or shareholders except upon the dissolution of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.1.

(a) No later than December 31, 2012, each mutual water company that operates a public water system shall submit to the local agency formation commission for its county a map depicting the approximate boundaries of the property that the mutual water company serves.

(b) A mutual water company that operates a public water system shall respond to a request from a local agency formation commission, located within a county that the mutual water company operates in, for information in connection with the preparation of municipal service reviews or spheres of influence pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 56425) of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 5 of the Government Code within 45 days of the request.
 The mutual water company shall provide all reasonably available nonconfidential information relating to the operation of the public water system. The mutual water company shall explain, in writing, why any requested information is not reasonably available. The mutual water company shall not be required to disclose any information pertaining to the names, addresses, or water usage of any specific shareholder. This subdivision shall not be interpreted to require a mutual water company to undertake any study or investigation. A mutual water company may comply with this section by submitting to the local agency formation commission the same information that the mutual water company submitted to the State Department of Public Health.

(c) A mutual water company that operates a public water system shall be subject to the requirements of, and has the powers granted by, subdivision (b) of Section 116755 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 512, Sec. 4.   (AB 54)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.2.

Each board member of a mutual water company that operates a public water system shall comply with the training requirements set out in subdivision (a) of Section 116755 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 512, Sec. 5.   (AB 54)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.3.

(a) All construction on public water systems operated by a mutual water company shall be designed and constructed to comply with the applicable California Waterworks standards, as provided in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 64551) of Division 4 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) A mutual water company that operates a public water system shall maintain a financial reserve fund for repairs and replacements to its water production, transmission, and distribution facilities at a level sufficient for continuous operation of facilities in compliance with the federal Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300f et seq.) and the California Safe Drinking Water Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116270) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health
 and Safety Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 23.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------
